Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-1412
Insurance carrier; annual filing; contents; report.

(1) On or before March 31 each year, each insurance carrier shall file with the department the following information for the most recent calendar year:

(a) The total number of incentive payments made pursuant to the insurance carrier's shared savings incentive payment program;

(b) The use of shoppable health care services by category of service for which incentive payments are made;

(c) The total amount of incentive payments made to enrollees;

(d) The average amount of incentive payments made by category of shoppable health care service;

(e) The total savings achieved below the average prices by category of shoppable health care service; and

(f) The total number and percentage of an insurance carrier's enrollees that participated in the shared savings incentive payment program.

(2) On or before July 1, 2027, and on or before July 1 every two years thereafter, the department shall electronically submit an aggregate report for all insurance carriers filing the information required by subsection (1) of this section to the Legislature.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 22;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 1.
July 18, 2026